Maine, session 132, LD1008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §192, as amended by PL 1973, c. 567, §20, is further amended to
read:
§192. Prosecution of all claims for State
All civil actions to recover money for the State shall must be brought by the Attorney
General in accordance with section 192-A or by the district attorney in the name of the
State. The Attorney General shall appear before the departments and tribunals of the United
States and the committees of Congress to prosecute all claims of the State against the
United States.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §192-A is enacted to read:
§192-A. Legislative approval of Attorney General actions; citizen-initiated review
1. Legislative review. In any civil suit brought on behalf of the State that the Attorney
General identifies as needing legislative approval, the Attorney General shall prepare and
present a proposal to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over judiciary matters requesting approval to file the case in state or federal court.
2. Committee authority to report out legislation. In response to a request under
subsection 1, the committee may report out legislation to the Legislature in the current
legislative session in which the committee sits authorizing the Attorney General to initiate
a civil suit in state or federal court.
3. Legislative approval. The Attorney General may not file a civil suit on behalf of
the State in state or federal court unless the Legislature approves of the Attorney General's
request by a vote of a majority of its members and submits the approval legislation for
signature and approval of the Governor.
4. Citizen-initiated review. A registered voter of the State may, at any time, submit a
written application to the Department of the Secretary of State on a form designed by the
Secretary of State to initiate a petition to be circulated directing the Attorney General to
move for a dismissal of a civil suit filed on behalf of the State. On receipt, the Secretary of
State or the Secretary of State's designee shall review the application and determine the
form of the petition to be submitted to the voters. Upon the filing of the application, the
Attorney General shall file a motion to stay the proceedings until the completion of the
petition process outlined in this subsection. Circulation of petitions under this subsection
must comply with Title 21-A, chapter 11. If a petition contains 500 valid signatures within
one year of its issuance, the Attorney General shall move for a dismissal of the civil suit.
5. Interim requests. If the Attorney General requests legislative approval under
subsection 1 when the Legislature is not in session, the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters, the House of Representatives and
the Senate are authorized to meet for the purpose of completing the review process in
subsections 2 and 3.